Alaska statutes. Title 12. Code of Criminal Procedure.
Chapter 85. General Provisions.

Sec. 12.85.010.
Applicability of title and supreme court rules.

The provisions of this title apply to all criminal actions and proceedings in all courts except where specific provision is otherwise made or where the Rules of Criminal Procedure adopted by the supreme court under its constitutional authority apply. This title governs all proceedings in actions brought after January 1, 1963, and all further proceedings in actions then pending, except to the extent that, in the opinion of the court, their application in a particular action pending when the rules take effect would not be feasible, or would work injustice, in which event, the laws in effect before January 1, 1963, apply.

History.

(§§ 1.01, 13.03 ch 34 SLA 1962)

Cross references. —

For scope of court rules, see Rule 1, Alaska Rule of Criminal Procedure.

Sec. 12.85.020.
Short title.

This title may be cited as the Code of Criminal Procedure.

History.

(§ 13.01 ch 34 SLA 1962)